Idaho, session 2025, S1216.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-208, Idaho Code, as amended in Section 1 of
House Bill No. 354, as enacted by the First Regular Session of the Sixty-
eighth Idaho Legislature, be, and the same is hereby amended to read as fol-
lows:
63-208. RULES PERTAINING TO MARKET VALUE -- DUTY OF ASSESSORS. (1) It
shall be the duty of the state tax commission to prepare and distribute to
each county assessor and the county commissioners within the state of Idaho
rules prescribing and directing the manner in which market value for assess-
ment purposes is to be determined for the purpose of taxation. The rules
promulgated by the state tax commission shall require each assessor to find
market value for assessment purposes of all property, except that expressly
exempt under chapter 6, title 63, Idaho Code, within his county according to
recognized appraisal methods and techniques as set forth by the state tax
commission; provided, that the actual and functional use shall be a major
consideration when determining market value for assessment purposes. The
recognized appraisal methods shall, at a minimum, require the assessment
of such property to reflect, within reasonable statistical certainty, the
median ratio of assessed value to market value for the categories of prop-
erty being tested within a range of ninety percent (90%) to one hundred ten
percent (110%) of such median ratio market value, using statistical methods
such as confidence intervals to determine compliance and requiring cor-
rective actions if the ratio falls outside of this range. Each category of
property tested shall also have a level of assessment that is provable with
reasonable statistical certainty to be not more than five (5) percentage
points different than that of each other category of property tested.
(2) To maximize uniformity and equity in assessment of different cat-
egories of property, such rules shall, to the extent practical, require the
use of reproduction or replacement cost less depreciation as opposed to his-
toric cost less depreciation whenever cost is considered as a single or one
(1) of several factors in establishing the market value of depreciable prop-
erty. The state tax commission shall also prepare and distribute amendments
and changes to the rules as shall be necessary in order to carry out the in-
tent and purposes of this title. The rules shall be in the form as the commis-
sion shall direct, and shall be made available upon request to other public
officers and the general public in reasonable quantities without charge. In


ascertaining the market value for assessment purposes of any item of prop-
erty, the assessor of each county shall, and is required to, abide by, adhere
to and conform with rules promulgated by the state tax commission.
(3) When establishing the real property market value for assessment
purposes of income-producing property, the assessor may use one (1) or more
market valuation methods, provided that the market value shall not include
contract rent related to the real estate only and shall exclude any value
of exempt intangible personal property as provided in section 63-602L,
Idaho Code. Upon request by the property owner, the assessor shall provide
the property owner with the assessor's calculations used to derive the in-
come-producing property owner's market value, including any value exempted
by statute.
SECTION 2. This act shall be in full force and effect on and after Jan-
uary 1, 2026.